Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-727
Hunting; privately
owned land; violations; penalty.

Any person violating section 37-722 or sections
37-724 to 37-726 shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor and shall be fined at least two hundred dollars upon conviction.

Laws 1963, c. 199, § 5, p. 647;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 178;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-213.06;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 341;

Laws 2009, LB105, § 35.